Massachusetts, session 194th, H403.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 6C of the General Laws is hereby is hereby amended
by striking out, in lines 294 to 296, inclusive, the words “and funding; and (48) designate a
representative to act in its interest in labor relations matters with its employees” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:-
and funding;
(48) designate a representative to act in its interest in labor relations matters with its
employees;
(49) sell, lease or otherwise contract for advertising, including in or on the facilities of the
department; and
of 2

(50) exercise all the powers and duties formerly exercised by the outdoor advertising
board under chapter 93.
SECTION 2. Clause (50) of section 3 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as inserted by
section 1 of this act, shall take effect as of November 1, 2009.
SECTION 3. Section 29 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following 2
sentences:- For the purposes of this section, a public park or reservation shall include a parkway
under the jurisdiction of the department of conservation and recreation. Such rules and
regulations shall require that said billboards, signs, and other advertising devices: (i) shall not be
located within 500 feet of a public park or reservation without local approval; and (ii) shall not
obstruct the view of any location listed on the national register of historic places without local
approval.
SECTION 4. Paragraph (n) of Section 3 of chapter 161A of the General Laws, as
appearing 707 in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“authority”, in line 708 112, the following words:- ; provided, that outdoor advertisements shall
be subject to local zoning and approval.
of 2